Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
ARTICLE 3
DEPENDENCY AND NEGLECT

Editor's note:
This title was repealed and reenacted in 1987. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note following the title heading.

Law reviews:
For comment, "The Indian

C
hild Welfare Act of 1978: Protecting Essential Tribal Interests", see 60 U.

C
olo. L. Rev. 131 (1989); for article, "Representing Foster Parents in Dependency and Neglect Proceedings", see 22 Colo. Law. 1697 (1993); for article, "Dependency and Neglect Law: New Legislation and Case Law", see 35 Colo.
Law. 79 (Sept. 2006); for article, "Colorado's Family-Integrated Problem-Solving Courts" see 42 Colo. Law. 75 (Nov. 2013); for article, "Representing Respondent Parents: Measuring the Impact of the ORPC", see 46 Colo. Law. 34 (Dec. 2017).

Section

PART 1 DEFINITIONS

PART 2 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 3 CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT

PART 4 TEMPORARY CUSTODY AND SHELTER

PART 5 PETITION, ADJUDICATION,
DISPOSITION

PART 6 TERMINATION OF THE PARENT-CHILD
LEGAL RELATIONSHIP

PART 7 REVIEW OF PLACEMENT

PART 8 TASK FORCE ON THE COLLECTION AND SECURITY OF DIGITAL IMAGES OF CHILD ABUSE OR NEGLECT

PART 9 TASK FORCE ON HIGH-QUALITY PARENTING TIME